Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.070

Source of hemp seeds or clones.

A person producing hemp pursuant to this chapter must notify the department of the source of the hemp seed or clones solely for the purpose of maintaining a record of the sources of seeds and clones being used or having been used for hemp production in this state. Hemp seed is an agricultural seed.

[ 2019 c 158 s 7.]